Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
General Provisions

§ 17-1-1.
Definitions.

The following words, whenever used in this chapter, shall, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, have the following meanings:

“Municipality” means any incorporated city, town or village within the state.

“Governing authority” or “governing authorities,” in the case of counties, means the board of supervisors of the county, and, in the case of municipalities, means the council, board, commissioners or other legislative body charged by law with governing the municipality.

“Comprehensive plan” means a statement of public policy for the physical development of the entire municipality or county adopted by resolution of the governing body, consisting of the following elements at a minimum:

Goals and objectives for the long-range (twenty (20) to twenty-five (25) years) development of the county or municipality. Required goals and objectives shall address, at a minimum, residential, commercial and industrial development; parks, open space and recreation; street or road improvements; public schools and community facilities.

A land use plan which designates in map or policy form the proposed general distribution and extent of the uses of land for residences, commerce, industry, recreation and open space, public/quasi-public facilities and lands. Background information shall be provided concerning the specific meaning of land use categories depicted in the plan in terms of the following: residential densities; intensity of commercial uses; industrial and public/quasi-public uses; and any other information needed to adequately define the meaning of such land use codes. Projections of population and economic growth for the area encompassed by the plan may be the basis for quantitative recommendations for each land use category.

A transportation plan depicting in map form the proposed functional classifications for all existing and proposed streets, roads and highways for the area encompassed by the land use plan and for the same time period as that covered by the land use plan. Functional classifications shall consist of arterial, collector and local streets, roads and highways, and these classifications shall be defined on the plan as to minimum right-of-way and surface width requirements; these requirements shall be based upon traffic projections. All other forms of transportation pertinent to the local jurisdiction shall be addressed as appropriate. The transportation plan shall be a basis for a capital improvements program.

A community facilities plan as a basis for a capital improvements program including, but not limited to, the following: housing; schools; parks and recreation; public buildings and facilities; and utilities and drainage.

“Amateur radio service” means those individuals and stations licensed by the Federal Communications Commission to broadcast amateur radio signals regardless of the transmission mode.

“Agricultural operation” means the facilities, sites and uses defined in Section 95-3-29(2)(a).

“Forestry activity” means the activity defined in Section 95-3-29(2)(b).

“Traditional farm practices” means the customs and standards defined in Section 95-3-29(2)(c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2006); Laws, 2018, ch. 377, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 2018).

§ 17-1-3.
General powers; reasonable accommodation of amateur radio communications.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 17-1-21(2) and in Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact described in Section 57-36-1, for the purpose of promoting health, safety, morals, or the general welfare of the community, the governing authority of any municipality, and, with respect to the unincorporated part of any county, the governing authority of any county, in its discretion, are empowered to regulate the height, number of stories and size of building and other structures, the percentage of lot that may be occupied, the size of the yards, courts and other open spaces, the density of population, and the location and use of buildings, structures and land for trade, industry, residence or other purposes, but no permits shall be required with reference to land used for agricultural purposes, including forestry activities as defined in Section 95-3-29(2)(b), or for the erection, maintenance, repair or extension of farm buildings or farm structures, including forestry buildings and structures, outside the corporate limits of municipalities. The governing authority of each county and municipality may create playgrounds and public parks, and for these purposes, each of such governing authorities shall possess the power, where requisite, of eminent domain and the right to apply public money thereto, and may issue bonds therefor as otherwise permitted by law.

Local land use regulation ordinances involving the placement, screening, or height of amateur radio antenna structures must reasonably accommodate amateur communications and must constitute the minimum practicable regulation to accomplish local authorities’ legitimate purposes of addressing health, safety, welfare and aesthetic considerations. Judgments as to the types of reasonable accommodation to be made and the minimum practicable regulation necessary to address these purposes will be determined by local governing authorities within the parameters of the law. This legislation supports the amateur radio service in preparing for and providing emergency communications for the State of Mississippi and local emergency management agencies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2474; 1942, §§ 2890.5, 3590; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1938, ch. 333; Laws, 1946, ch. 292; Laws, 1956, ch. 197, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1958, chs. 520, 532; Laws, 1960, ch. 402; Laws, 1994, ch. 647, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 340, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2006); Laws, 2018, ch. 377, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 2018).

§ 17-1-5.
Manner of exercise of powers conferred.

Except as otherwise provided in Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact described in Section 57-36-1, in the exercise and enforcement of the powers conferred by Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive, each county and each municipality within the county may act independently one from the other, or, in the exercise of discretion, the governing authority of any county and the governing authority of any municipality located within the county may act jointly in order to attain uniformity and consistency in the zoning regulations for the areas to be affected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2474; 1942, §§ 2890.5, 3590; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1938, ch. 333; Laws, 1946, ch. 292; Laws, 1956, ch. 197 §§ 1-6; Laws, 1958, chs. 520, 532; Laws, 1960, ch. 402; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 17-1-7.
Zones.

Except as otherwise provided in Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact described in Section 57-36-1, for the purposes set forth in Section 17-1-3, the governing authority of each municipality and county may divide the municipality or county into zones of such number, shape and area as may be deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive. Within the zones created, the governing authority of each municipality and county may, subject to the restrictions with respect to agricultural lands and farm buildings or structures as set out in Section 17-1-3, regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures or land. All regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each zone, but regulations in one zone may differ from those in other zones.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2475; 1942, § 3591; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 17-1-9.
Purposes in view.

Zoning regulations shall be made in accordance with a comprehensive plan, and designed to lessen congestion in the streets; to secure safety from fire, panic and other dangers; to provide adequate light and air; to prevent the overcrowding of land; to avoid undue concentration of population; to facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water, sewerage, schools, parks and other public requirements. Such regulations shall be made with reasonable consideration, among other things, to the character of the district and its peculiar suitability for particular uses, and with a view to conserving the value of buildings, and encouraging the most appropriate use of land throughout such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2476; 1942, § 3592; Laws, 1926, ch. 308.

§ 17-1-11.
Official plan; local planning commission.

The governing authority of each municipality and county may provide for the preparation, adoption, amendment, extension and carrying out of a comprehensive plan for the purpose of bringing about coordinated physical development in accordance with present and future needs and may create, independently or jointly, a local planning commission with authority to prepare and propose (a) a comprehensive plan of physical development of the municipality or county; (b) a proposed zoning ordinance and map; (c) regulations governing subdivisions of land; (d) building or set back lines on streets, roads and highways; and (e) recommendations to the governing authorities of each municipality or county with regard to the enforcement of and amendments to the comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance, subdivision regulations and capital improvements program. The governing authority of each municipality and county may, in its discretion, pay to each member of a planning commission a per diem in an amount as determined by such governing authority for each day, or portion thereof, spent in the performance of his duties; however, no member of a planning commission may be paid more than One Hundred Twenty Dollars ($120.00) in the aggregate per month.

The definition of “comprehensive plan” set forth in paragraph (c) of Section 17-1-1 shall not be construed to affect, or to require the amendment of, any plan adopted by a county or municipality prior to July 1, 1988, which plan does not specifically conform to the minimum elements of a comprehensive plan required in such definition.

The governing authority of each municipality and county may adopt, amend and enforce the comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance, subdivision regulations and capital improvements program as recommended by the local planning commission after a public hearing thereon as provided by Section 17-1-15.

In the performance of its duties, the local planning commission may cooperate with, contract with, or accept funds from federal, state or local agencies or private individuals or corporations and may expend such funds and carry out such cooperative undertakings and contracts.

Any comprehensive plan established under this section shall not contain any provision which conflicts with Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development compact described in Section 57-36-1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 197, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1960, ch. 402; Laws, 1981, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 443; Laws, 1988, ch. 483, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 17-1-13.
Utilization of services of planning commissions, engineering departments or advisory committee.

The governing authority of each county or municipality may, in order to more effectively carry out its requisite zoning and planning activities, utilize the services of any appropriate local or regional planning commission, and it may consider, act upon or otherwise make use of the suggestions, proposals or recommendations of any such appropriate local or regional planning commission. Also, in carrying out its zoning and planning duties, the governing authority of each county and municipality may utilize the services of any appropriate municipal or county engineering department or the services of an advisory committee of citizens of such number as may be deemed appropriate to recommend the boundaries of the various original districts and appropriate regulations to be enforced therein. A preliminary report may be made, and public hearings thereon before submitting its final report, may be had.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930 § 2479; 1942, § 3595; Laws, 1926, ch. 308.

§ 17-1-15.
Procedure for establishing, amending, etc., of regulations, zone boundaries, etc.; notice and hearing.

The governing authority of each municipality and county shall provide for the manner in which the comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance (including the official zoning map) subdivision regulations and capital improvements program shall be determined, established and enforced, and from time to time, amended, supplemented or changed. However, no such plan, ordinance (including zoning boundaries), regulations or program shall become effective until after a public hearing, in relation thereto, at which parties in interest, and citizens, shall have an opportunity to be heard. At least fifteen (15) days’ notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be published in an official paper, or a paper of general circulation, in such municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2477; 1942, § 3593; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1988, ch. 483, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 17-1-17.
Changes.

Zoning regulations, restrictions and boundaries may, from time to time, be amended, supplemented, changed, modified or repealed upon at least fifteen (15) days’ notice of a hearing on such amendment, supplement, change, modification or repeal, said notice to be given in an official paper or a paper of general circulation in such municipality or county specifying a time and place for said hearing.The governing authorities or any municipal agency or commission, which by ordinance has been theretofore so empowered, may provide in such notice that the same shall be held before the city engineer or before an advisory committee of citizens as hereinafter provided and if the hearing is held before the said engineer or advisory committee it shall not be necessary for the governing body to hold such hearing but may act upon the recommendation of the city engineer or advisory committee.Provided, however, that any party aggrieved with the recommendation of the city engineer or advisory committee shall be entitled to a public hearing before the governing body of the city, with due notice thereof after publication for the time and as provided in this section.The governing authorities of a municipality which had a population in excess of one hundred forty thousand (140,000) according to the 1960 census, or of a municipality which is the county seat of a county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and the State of Alabama or of a municipality which had a population in excess of forty thousand (40,000) according to the 1970 census and which is within a county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico may enact an ordinance restricting such hearing to the record as made before the city engineer or advisory committee of citizens as herein above provided.

In case of a protest against such change signed by the owners of twenty percent (20%) or more, either of the area of the lots included in such proposed change, or of those immediately adjacent to the rear thereof, extending one hundred sixty (160) feet therefrom or of those directly opposite thereto, extending one hundred sixty (160) feet from the street frontage of such opposite lots, such amendment shall not become effective except by the favorable vote of three-fifths (3/5) of the members of the legislative body of such municipality or county who are not required by law or ethical considerations to recuse themselves.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2478; 1942, § 3594; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1962, ch. 553; Laws, 1971, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 396; Laws, 1979, ch. 504; Laws, 2004, ch. 551, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 17-1-19.
Remedies of local governing authorities.

In case any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted or maintained, or any building, structure, or land, is used in violation of the zoning law or of any ordinance or other regulation made under authority conferred hereby, the proper local authorities of any county or municipality, in addition to other remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceedings, to prevent such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion, maintenance or use, to restrain, correct, or abate such violation, to prevent the occupancy of said building, structure or land, or to prevent any illegal act, conduct, business, or use in or about such premises.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2480; 1942, § 3596; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1962, ch. 554, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 17-1-21.
When local regulations to govern; regulations restricting agricultural operation, forestry activity or traditional farm practices on agricultural land prohibited by municipalities; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and in Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact described in Section 57-36-1, whenever the provisions of any other statute or local ordinance or regulation require a greater width or size of yards, courts or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building, or a less number of stories, or a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other standards higher than are required by the regulations made under the authority of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive, the provisions of such other statute, or local ordinance or regulation shall govern; otherwise the provisions of the regulations made under the authority of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive, shall be controlling.

No governing authority of any municipality or of any county shall adopt or impose any ordinance, regulation, rule or policy that prohibits or restricts agricultural operation, forestry activity or traditional farm practices on agricultural land or land that is otherwise unclassified if the land is used for an agricultural operation, forestry activity or traditional farm practices. Additionally, if the activities being conducted on the land are regulated by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce or the Mississippi Forestry Commission, the provisions of those agencies’ statutes or the regulations promulgated by those agencies shall govern.

However, a governing authority of any municipality or of any county may enact or impose ordinances, regulations, rules or policies that prohibit or restrict agricultural, forestry or traditional farm practices or the erection of any building, structure or improvement upon land with such agricultural, forestry or traditional farm practices or lands governed by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce or the Mississippi Forestry Commission if such land is under Federal Aviation Administration Part 77 restrictions or if such activity, building, structure or improvement creates obstruction to navigable airspace.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not affect any ordinance, regulation, rule, or policy that is in effect, adopted, or amended prior to the effective date of this act. Additionally, paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be construed to affect the discretion of a county or municipal governing authority to reclassify property from one zone to another as otherwise permitted by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2481; 1942, § 3597; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998; Laws, 2018, ch. 377, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 2018).

§ 17-1-23.
Subdivision regulation.

When new subdivisions are laid out, the governing authority of each municipality or county may, before allowing dedication, impose such terms as may be deemed necessary to make the provisions of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-27, inclusive, effective, and such governing authorities may receive easements in the land affected whereby such sections may be made effective.

The board of supervisors of any county may order that no plat of a subdivision shall be recorded until it has been approved by the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors shall have power to require the installation of utilities and laying out of streets in subdivisions or to accept performance bonds in lieu thereof; the board of supervisors of any county bordering on the State of Tennessee having a population of more than sixty-seven thousand nine hundred (67,900) but less than seventy thousand (70,000) according to the 1990 federal census and having a land area of more than four hundred seventy (470) square miles but less than five hundred (500) square miles may also, in lieu thereof, require the deposit of monies with the county which shall be placed in a special interest-bearing account in the county treasury, and such board of supervisors at the appropriate time shall spend monies from such account solely for the purpose of constructing or improving the roads and other infrastructure within the subdivision with respect to which the deposit or deposits were made.

The governing authorities of a municipality may provide that any person desiring to subdivide a tract of land within the corporate limits shall submit a map and plat of such subdivision, and a correct abstract of title of the land platted, to said governing authorities, to be approved by them before the same shall be filed for record in the land records of the county; and where the municipality has adopted an ordinance so providing, no such map or plat of any such subdivision shall be recorded by the chancery clerk unless same has been approved by said governing authorities. In all cases where a map or plat of the subdivision is submitted to the governing authorities of a municipality, and is by them approved, all streets, roads, alleys and other public ways set forth and shown on said map or plat shall be thereby dedicated to the public use, and shall not be used otherwise unless and until said map or plat is vacated in the manner provided by law, notwithstanding that said streets, roads, alleys or other public ways have not been actually opened for the use of the public. If any easement dedicated pursuant to the provisions of this section for a street, road, alley or other public purpose is determined to be not needed for the public purpose, the easement may be declared abandoned, and ownership of the fee underlying the easement shall revert, regardless of the date of dedication, to the adjoining property owner or owners at the time of abandonment. Ownership of such easement shall extend to the centerline of said abandoned street, road or public way. Such abandonment and reversion shall not affect any private easements which might exist.

If the owner of any land which shall have been laid off, mapped or platted as a city, town or village, or addition thereto, or subdivision thereof, or other platted area, whether inside or outside a municipality, desires to alter or vacate such map or plat, or any part thereof, he may petition the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality for relief in the premises, setting forth the particular circumstances of the case and giving an accurate description of the property, the map or plat of which is to be vacated or altered and the names of the persons to be adversely affected thereby or directly interested therein. However, before taking such action, the parties named shall be made aware of the action and must agree in writing to the vacation or alteration. Failure to gain approval from the parties named shall prohibit the board of supervisors or governing authorities from altering or vacating the map or plat, or any part thereof. Any alterations of a plat or map must be recorded in the appropriate location and a note shall be placed on the original plat denoting the altered or revised plat. No land shall be subdivided nor shall the map or plat of any land be altered or vacated in violation of any duly recorded covenant running with the land. Any municipality which shall approve such a vacation or alteration pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the sale of surplus real property provisions as set forth in Section 21-17-1.

Subdivision regulation under this section shall not conflict with Article VII of the Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact described in Section 57-36-1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2937; 1906 § 3328; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5825; 1930, §§ 2405, 2475; 1942, §§ 2890.5, 3374-123, 3591; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 123; Laws, 1956, ch. 197, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1960, ch. 402; Laws, 1997, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 8; Laws, 2008, ch. 339, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 531, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2009.).

§ 17-1-25.
Acceptance for maintenance of subdivision street before subdivision completed.

The governing authorities of each municipality or county of the state, in their discretion, may accept in the name of such municipality or county, for maintenance, any road or roads, or street or streets, as shall be completed to acceptable specifications established by such governing authorities of a municipality or county of each such subdivision or subdivisions as shall be located within the corporate limits of a municipality or the boundaries of a county.

By acceptance of such street or road by such governing authorities, even though such subdivision shall not be completed as proposed or platted, such municipality or county shall not be bound to accept in part or in its entirety such subdivision when it shall be completed except as provided by regular procedures by ordinance or regulation of such municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-123.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 601, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 22, 1966).

§ 17-1-27.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall knowingly and wilfully violate the terms, conditions or provisions of a zoning ordinance adopted under the authority of Sections 17-1-1 through 17-1-25, inclusive, for violation of which no other criminal penalty is prescribed, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction therefor shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and in case of continuing violations without reasonable effort on the part of the defendant to correct same, each day the violation continues thereafter shall be a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2480; 1942, § 3596; Laws, 1926, ch. 308; Laws, 1962, ch. 554, eff from and after July 1, 1962.